sv: Ingredienser: 2,4-diklorfenoziättiksyra; Aloe vera; Bindemedel; Ringblomma; Deet; Färgämnen; Emulgeringsmedel; Enzymer; Doftämnen; Glyfosat; Lanolin; Citroneukalyptusolja; Neonikotinoider; Vaselin; Picaridin; Konserveringsmedel; Pyretriner; Lösningsmedel; Stabiliseringsämnen; Ytaktiva ämnen; Vitamin E; Vatten; Zinkoxid; Annat
fr: Ingrédients: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Constructeurs; Calendula; DEET; Colorants; Émulsifiants; Enzymes; Parfums; Glyphosate; Lanoline; Huile d’eucalyptus citronné; Néonicotinoïdes; Gelée de pétrole; Picaridine; Conservateurs; Pyréthrines; Solvants; Stabilisateurs; Tensioactifs; Vitamine E; Eau; Oxyde de zinc; Autre
th: วัตถุดิบ: 2,4-d; ว่านหางจระเข้; บิลเดอร์; คาเลนดูลา; ดีต; สี; อิมัลซิไฟเออร์; เอนไซม์; สารหอมระเหย; ไกลโฟเสต; ลาโนลิน; น้ำมันยูคาลิปตัสเลมอน; นีโอนิโคตินอยด์; ปิโตรเลียม เจลลี; พิคาริดิน; สารกันบูด; ไพรีทริน; ตัวทำละลาย; สารเพิ่มความคงตัว; สารลดแรงตึงผิว; วิตามินอี; น้ำ; ซิงค์ออกไซด์; อื่นๆ
hu: Hozzávalók: 2,4-D; Aloe vera; Adalékanyagok; Körömvirág; Dietiltoluamid; Színezékek; Emulgeátorok; Enzimek; Illatanyagok; Glifozát; Lanolin; Citromos eukaliptuszolaj; Neonikotinoidok; Vazelin; Pikaridin; Tartósítószerek; Piretrinek; Oldószerek; Stabilizátorok; Felületaktív anyagok; E-vitamin; Víz; Cink-oxid; Egyéb
es: Ingredientes: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Agentes constructores; Caléndula; DEET; Colorantes; Emulsionantes; Enzimas; Fragancias; Glifosato; Lanolina; Aceite de eucalipto y limón; Neonicotinoides; Vaselina; Picaridina; Conservantes; Piretrinas; Solventes; Estabilizadores; Surfactantes; Vitamina E; Agua; Óxido de zinc; Otros
pt-PT: Ingredientes: 2,4-d; Aloé vera; Compostos; Calêndula; Deet; Tintas; Emulsionantes; Enzimas; Fragrâncias; Glifosato; Lanolina; Óleo de eucalipto-limão; Neonicotinóides; Vaselina; Icaridina; Conservantes; Piretrinas; Solventes; Estabilizadores; Surfatantes; Vitamina E; Água; Óxido de zinco; Outro
pl: Składniki: 2,4-d; Aloes zwyczajny; Budowniczowie; Calendula; Deet; Barwniki; Emulgatory; Enzymy; Substancje zapachowe; Glifosat; Lanolina; Olejek z eukaliptusa cytrynowego; Neonikotynoidy; Wazelina; Pikarydyna; Konserwanty; Piretryny; Rozpuszczalniki; Stabilizatory; Środki powierzchniowo czynne; Witamina E; Woda; Tlenek cynku; Pozostałe
ro-RO: Ingrediente: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Săruri minerale; Calendula; N,N-dietil-meta-toluamidă; Coloranți; Emulsificatori; Enzime; Arome; Glifosat; Lanolină; Ulei de eucalipt de lămâie; Neonicotinoizi; Vaselină; Picaridin; Conservanți; Piretrine; Solvenți; Stabilizatori; Surfactanți; Vitamina E; Apă; Oxid de zinc; Altele
ko: 성분: 2,4-d; 알로에 베라; 빌더; 금잔화; 디트; 염료; 유화제; 효소; 방향제; 글리포세이트; 라놀린; 레몬 유칼립투스 오일; 네오니코티노이드; 바셀린; 피카리딘; 방부제; 피레트린; 용제; 안정제; 계면활성제; 비타민 E; 물; 산화아연; 기타
de: Inhaltsstoffe: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Baustoff; Ringelblume; Diethyltoluamid (DEET); Farbstoffe; Emulgatoren; Enzyme; Düfte; Glyphosat; Lanolin; Zitroneneukalyptus-Öl; Neonicotinoide; Vaseline; Icaridin; Konservierungsmittel; Pyrethrine; Lösungsmittel; Stabilisatoren; Tenside; Vitamin E; Wasser; Zinkoxid; Sonstiges
ja: 原材料: 2,4-d; アロエベラ; ビルダー; カレンデュラ; ディート; 染料; 乳化剤; 酵素; 香料; グリホサート; ラノリン; レモンユーカリオイル; ネオニコチノイド; 石油ゼリー; ピカリジン; 防腐剤; ピレトリン; 溶剤; 安定剤; 界面活性剤; ビタミンE; 水; 酸化亜鉛; その他
ru: Ингредиенты: 2,4-d; Алоэ вера; Компоненты; Календула; ДЭТА; Красители; Эмульгаторы; Ферменты; Ароматизаторы; Глифосат; Ланолин; Масло лимонного эвкалипта; Неоникотиноиды; Вазелин; Пикаридин; Консерванты; Пиретрины; Растворители; Стабилизаторы; Поверхностно-активные вещества; Витамин Е; Вода; Оксид цинка; Другие
fi: Ainesosat: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Elvyttävät; Kehäkukka; Deet; Väriaineet; Emulgointiaineet; Entsyymit; Hajusteet; Glyfosaatti; Lanoliini; Sitruuna-eukalyptusöljy; Neonikotinoidit; Vaseliini; Pikaridiini; Säilöntäaineet; Pyretriinit; Liuottimet; Stabilisaattorit; Pinta-aktiiviset aineet; E-vitamiini; Vesi; Sinkkioksidi; Muu
hr-HR: Sastojci: 2,4-d; Aloja; Gradivni sastojci; Neven; Deet; Bojila; Emulgatori; Enzimi; Mirisi; Glifosat; Lanolin; Ulje limunskog eukaliptusa; Neonikotinoidi; Vazelin; Pikaridin; Konzervansi; Piretrini; Otapala; Stabilizatori; Surfaktanti; Vitamin E; Voda; Cinkov oksid; Ostalo
zh-TW: 成分: 2,4-二氯苯氧乙酸; 蘆薈; 助洗劑; 金盞花; 敵避; 染料; 乳化劑; 酵素; 香料; 嘉磷塞; 羊毛脂; 檸檬尤加利精油; 類尼古丁; 凡士林; 派卡瑞丁; 防腐劑; 除蟲菊酯; 溶劑; 穩定劑; 界面活性劑; 維生素 E; 水; 氧化鋅; 其他
tr: İçindekiler: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Bağlayıcılar; Aynısefa; Deet; Boyalar; Emülgatörler; Enzimler; Kokular; Glifosat; Lanolin; Limon okaliptüs yağı; Neonikotinoidler; Vazelin; Pikaridin; Koruyucular; Piretrinler; Solventler; Stabilizatörler; Yüzey aktif maddeler; E vitamini; Su; Çinko oksit; Diğer
nl: Ingrediënten: 2,4-D; Aloe vera; Bouwstoffen; Goudsbloem; DEET; Kleurstoffen; Emulgatoren; Enzymen; Geurstoffen; Glyfosaat; Lanoline; Citroen-eucalyptusolie; Neonicotinoïden; Vaseline; Picaridine; Conserveringsmiddelen; Pyrethrines; Oplosmiddelen; Stabilisatoren; Oppervlakteactieve stoffen; Vitamine E; Water; Zinkoxide; Andere
en: Ingredients: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Builders; Calendula; Deet; Dyes; Emulsifiers; Enzymes; Fragrances; Glyphosate; Lanolin; Lemon eucalyptus oil; Neonicotinoids; Petroleum jelly; Picaridin; Preservatives; Pyrethrins; Solvents; Stabilizers; Surfactants; Vitamin E; Water; Zinc oxide; Other
sk-SK: Zložky: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Stavitelia; Nechtík lekársky; Deet; Farbivá; Emulgátory; Enzýmy; Vône; Glyfosát; Lanolín; Citrónový eukalyptový olej; Neonikotinoidy; Vazelína; Pikaridín; Konzervačné látky; Pyretríny; Rozpúšťadlá; Stabilizátory; Povrchovo aktívne látky; Vitamín E; Voda; Oxid zinočnatý; Iné
lt-LT: Ingredientai: 2,4-d; Alijošius; Statybininės; Medetkos; DEET; Dažikliai; Emulsikliai; Fermentai; Kvapikliai; Glifosatas; Lanolinas; Citrinkvapių eukaliptų aliejus; Neonikotinoidai; Vazelinas; Pikaridinas; Konservantai; Piretrinai; Tirpikliai; Stabilizatoriai; Paviršinio aktyvumo medžiagos; Vitaminas E; Vanduo; Cinko oksidas; Kita
zh-CN: 成分: 2,4-d; 芦荟; 增洁剂; 金盏花; 避蚊胺; 染料; 乳化剂; 酶; 芳香剂; 草甘膦; 羊毛脂; 柠檬桉油; 新烟碱类; 凡士林; 派卡瑞丁; 防腐剂; 除虫菊酯; 溶剂; 稳定剂; 表面活性剂; 维生素 E; 饮用水/纯净水; 氧化锌; 其他
vi: Nguyên liệu: 2,4-d; Nha đam; Chất tăng cường làm sạch; Cúc xuxi; DEET; Thuốc nhuộm; Chất nhũ hóa; Enzim; Hương liệu; Glyphosate; Lanolin; Tinh dầu bạch đàn chanh; Neonicotinoid; Sáp từ xăng dầu; Picaridin; Chất bảo quản; Pyrethrin; Dung môi; Chất ổn định; Chất hoạt động bề mặt; Vitamin E; Nước; Kẽm oxit; Khác
it: Ingredienti: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Integratori; Calendula; Deet; Coloranti; Emulsionanti; Enzimi; Fragranze; Glifosato; Lanolina; Olio di eucalipto citrato; Neonicotinoidi; Vaselina; Picaridina; Conservanti; Piretrine; Solventi; Stabilizzatori; Tensioattivi; Vitamina E; Acqua; Ossido di zinco; Altro
pt-BR: Ingredientes: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Ativador; Calêndula; Deet; Corantes; Emulsificantes; Enzimas; Fragrâncias; Glifosato; Lanolina; Óleo de eucalipto-limão; Neonicotinóides; Vaselina; Icaridina; Conservantes; Piretrinas; Solventes; Estabilizantes; Surfatantes; Vitamina E; Água; Óxido de zinco; Outro
cs: Ingredience: 2,4-d; Aloe pravá; Stavební látky; Měsíček lékařský; DEET; Barviva; Emulgátory; Enzymy; Vůně; Glyfosát; Lanolin; Olej z citronového eukalyptu; Neonikotinoidy; Vazelína; Ikaridín; Konzervanty; Pyrethriny; Rozpouštědla; Stabilizátory; Povrchově aktivní látky; Vitamín E; Voda; Oxid zinečnatý; Jiné
bg-BG: Съставки: 2,4-d; Алое вера; Добавки; Невен; Deet; Оцветители; Емулгатори; Ензими; Аромати; Глифозат; Ланолин; Масло от лимонов евкалипт; Неоникотиноиди; Вазелин; Пикаридин; Консерванти; Пиретрини; Разтворители; Стабилизатори; Повърхностноактивни вещества; Витамин Е; Вода; Цинков оксид; Други
el: Συστατικά: 2,4-d; Αλόη βέρα; Μεγαποδίδες; Καλέντουλα; Deet; Χρωστικές ύλες; Γαλακτωματοποιητές; Ένζυμα; Αρώματα; Γλυφοσάτη; Λανολίνη; Έλαιο ευκαλύπτου λεμονιού; Νεονικοτινοειδή; Βαζελίνη; Πικαριδίνη; Συντηρητικά; Πυρεθρίνες; Διαλύτες; Σταθεροποιητές; Επιφανειοδραστικές ουσίες; Βιταμίνη Ε; Νερό; Οξείδιο ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο
da: Ingredienser: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Opbyggere; Morgenfrue; Deet; Farvestoffer; Emulgatorer; Enzymer; Duftstoffer; Glyphosat; Lanolin; Olie fra citroneukalyptus; Neonicotinoider; Vaseline; Picaridin; Konserveringsmidler; Pyrethriner; Opløsningsmidler; Stabilisatorer; Overfladeaktive stoffer; E-vitamin; Vand; Zinkoxid; Andet
sl-SI: Sestavine: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Gradniki; Ognjič; Deet; Barvila; Emulgatorji; Encimi; Dišave; Glifosat; Lanolin; Olje limoninega evkaliptusa; Neonikotinoidi; Vazelin; Picaridin; Konzervansi; Piretrini; Topila; Stabilizatorji; Površinsko aktivne snovi; Vitamin E; Voda; Cinkov oksid; Drugo
nb: Ingredienser: 2,4-d; Aloe vera; Byggere; Calendula; Deet; Fargestoffer; Emulgatorer; Enzymer; Hjemmedufter; Glyfosat; Lanolin; Sitroneukalyptusolje; Neonicotinoider; Vaselin; Picaridin; Konserveringsmidler; Pyrethriner; Løsemidler; Stabilisatorer; Surfaktant; Vitamin E; Vann; Sinkoksid; Annen